test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_styeres_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - styeres: # 
    styeres+A+Sg+Nom: styeres
    styeres+A+Attr: stuorrâ
    styeres+A+Sg+Gen: stuárrá
    styeres+A+Sg+Acc: stuárrá
    styeres+A+Sg+Ill: stuárrás
    styeres+A+Sg+Loc: stuárrást
    styeres+A+Sg+Com: stuárráin
    styeres+A+Sg+Abe: [stuáráttáá, stuárráttáá]
    styeres+A+Ess: styeresin
    styeres+A+Par: styeresid
    styeres+A+Pl+Nom: stuárráh
    styeres+A+Pl+Gen: stuárrái
    styeres+A+Pl+Acc: stuárráid
    styeres+A+Pl+Ill: stuárráid
    styeres+A+Pl+Loc: stuárráin
    styeres+A+Pl+Com: stuárráiguin
    styeres+A+Pl+Abe: stuárráittáá

    styeres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: stuárráb
    styeres+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: stuárráb
    styeres+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: stuárráb
    styeres+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: stuárráábân
    styeres+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: stuárráábist
    styeres+A+Comp+Sg+Com: stuárráábáin
    styeres+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: stuárrábttáá
    styeres+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: stuárráábeh
    styeres+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: stuárráábij
    styeres+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: stuárráábijd
    styeres+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: stuárráábáid
    styeres+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: stuárráábijn
    styeres+A+Comp+Pl+Com: stuárráábijguin
    styeres+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: stuárráábijttáá
    styeres+A+Comp+Ess: stuárráábin
    styeres+A+Comp+Par: stuárráábid

    styeres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: stuárráámus
    styeres+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: stuárráámuu
    styeres+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: stuárráámuu
    styeres+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: [stuárráámusân, stuárráámui]
    styeres+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: stuárráámuust
    styeres+A+Superl+Sg+Com: stuárráámuin
    styeres+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: stuárráámuuttáá
    styeres+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: [stuárráámuuh, stuárráámusah]
    styeres+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [stuárráámui, stuárráámusâi]
    styeres+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: [stuárráámuid, stuárráámusâid]
    styeres+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: [stuárráámuid, stuárráámussáid]
    styeres+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [stuárráámuin, stuárráámusâin]
    styeres+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [stuárráámuiguin, stuárráámusâiguin]
    styeres+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: [stuárráámuittáá, stuárráámusâittáá]
    styeres+A+Superl+Ess: [stuárráámužžân, stuárráámussân]
    styeres+A+Superl+Par: [stuárráámužžâd, stuárráámussâd]
